Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 3 Telegraph Service

Cross references.

Authority of telegraph companies to engage in business of selling or issuing checks, money orders, etc., §

7-1-681

.

46-5-140 through 46-5-149.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 1880-81, p. 115, §§ 1, 2; Code 1882, § 3412; Ga. L. 1893, p. 86, §§ 1-5; Civil Code 1895, §§ 2339-2343, 2348; Ga. L. 1908, p. 94, §§ 1, 2; Civil Code 1910, §§ 2803-2807, 2812-2814; Code 1933, §§ 104-101—104-104, 104-201, 104-206—104-208; Code 1981, §§

46-5-140

—46-5-149; Ga. L. 1983, p. 859, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 46, Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 46; Ga. L. 2005, p. 524, § 1/HB 622; repealed by Ga. L. 2012, p. 847, § 11/HB 1115, effective July 1, 2012.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 847, § 11/HB 1115 repealed and reserved this article, effective July 1, 2012.